Indiana, session 2026, HB1040.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-22-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2018,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Crime of child abuse" means:
(A) neglect of a dependent (IC 35-46-1-4) if the dependent is
a child and the offense is committed under:
(i) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(1);
(ii) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(2); or
(iii) IC 35-46-1-4(a)(3);
(B) child selling (IC 35-46-1-4(d));
(C) a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) committed
against a child; or
(D) battery against a child under:
(i) IC 35-42-2-1(e)(3) (battery on a child);
(ii) IC 35-42-2-1(g)(5)(B) IC 35-42-2-1(h)(5)(B) (battery
causing bodily injury to a child);
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(iii) IC 35-42-2-1(j) IC 35-42-2-1(k) (battery causing
serious bodily injury to a child); or
(iv) IC 35-42-2-1(k) IC 35-42-2-1(l) (battery resulting in the
death of a child).
(2) "Office" refers to the office of judicial administration created
under by IC 33-24-6-1.
(3) "Registry" means the child abuse registry established under
section 2 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 5-14-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.33-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The following public records are excepted
from section 3 of this chapter and may not be disclosed by a public
agency, unless access to the records is specifically required by a state
or federal statute or is ordered by a court under the rules of discovery:
(1) Those declared confidential by state statute.
(2) Those declared confidential by rule adopted by a public
agency under specific authority to classify public records as
confidential granted to the public agency by statute.
(3) Those required to be kept confidential by federal law.
(4) Records containing trade secrets.
(5) Confidential financial information obtained, upon request,
from a person. However, this does not include information that is
filed with or received by a public agency pursuant to state statute.
(6) Information concerning research, including actual research
documents, conducted under the auspices of a state educational
institution, including information:
(A) concerning any negotiations made with respect to the
research; and
(B) received from another party involved in the research.
(7) Grade transcripts and license examination scores obtained as
part of a licensure process.
(8) Those declared confidential by or under rules adopted by the
supreme court of Indiana.
(9) Patient medical records and charts created by a provider,
unless the patient gives written consent under IC 16-39 or as
provided under IC 16-41-8.
(10) Application information declared confidential by the Indiana
economic development corporation under IC 5-28.
(11) A photograph, a video recording, or an audio recording of an
autopsy, except as provided in IC 36-2-14-10.
(12) A Social Security number contained in the records of a
public agency.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(13) The following information that is part of a foreclosure action
subject to IC 32-30-10.5:
(A) Contact information for a debtor, as described in
IC 32-30-10.5-8(d)(1)(B).
(B) Any document submitted to the court as part of the debtor's
loss mitigation package under IC 32-30-10.5-10(a)(3).
(14) The following information obtained from a call made to a
fraud hotline established under IC 36-1-8-8.5:
(A) The identity of any individual who makes a call to the
fraud hotline.
(B) A report, transcript, audio recording, or other information
concerning a call to the fraud hotline.
However, records described in this subdivision may be disclosed
to a law enforcement agency, a private university police
department, the attorney general, the inspector general, the state
examiner, or a prosecuting attorney.
(15) Information described in section 5(c)(3)(B) of this chapter
that is contained in a daily log or record described in section 5(c)
of this chapter for a victim of a crime or delinquent act who is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, unless and to the extent that:
(A) a parent, guardian, or custodian of the victim consents in
writing to public disclosure of the records; and
(B) that parent, guardian, or custodian of the victim has not
been charged with or convicted of committing a crime against
the victim.
However, records described in this subdivision may be disclosed
to the department of child services.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (a), the following
public records shall be excepted from section 3 of this chapter at the
discretion of a public agency:
(1) Investigatory records of law enforcement agencies or private
university police departments. For purposes of this chapter, a law
enforcement recording is not an investigatory record. However,
information described in subsection (a)(15) contained in a law
enforcement recording is exempt from disclosure, unless and to
the extent that a parent, guardian, or custodian of the victim
consents in writing to public disclosure of the records. However,
a parent, guardian, or custodian charged with or convicted of a
crime against the victim may not consent to public disclosure of
the records. Law enforcement agencies or private university
police departments may share investigatory records with:
(A) a person who advocates on behalf of a crime victim,
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


including a victim advocate (as defined in IC 35-37-6-3.5) or
a victim service provider (as defined in IC 35-37-6-5), for the
purposes of providing services to a victim or describing
services that may be available to a victim;
(B) a school corporation (as defined by IC 20-18-2-16(a)),
charter school (as defined by IC 20-24-1-4), or nonpublic
school (as defined by IC 20-18-2-12) for the purpose of
enhancing the safety or security of a student or a school
facility; and
(C) the victim services division of the Indiana criminal justice
institute under IC 5-2-6-8, for the purposes of conducting an
investigation under IC 5-2-6.1-26;
without the law enforcement agency or private university police
department losing its discretion to keep those records confidential
from other records requesters. However, certain law enforcement
records must be made available for inspection and copying as
provided in section 5 of this chapter.
(2) The work product of an attorney representing, pursuant to
state employment or an appointment by a public agency:
(A) a public agency;
(B) the state; or
(C) an individual.
(3) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
in administering a licensing examination, examination for
employment, or academic examination before the examination is
given or if it is to be given again.
(4) Scores of tests if the person is identified by name and has not
consented to the release of the person's scores.
(5) The following:
(A) Records relating to negotiations between:
(i) the Indiana economic development corporation;
(ii) the ports of Indiana;
(iii) the Indiana state department of agriculture;
(iv) the Indiana finance authority;
(v) an economic development commission;
(vi) the Indiana White River state park development
commission;
(vii) a local economic development organization that is a
nonprofit corporation established under state law whose
primary purpose is the promotion of industrial or business
development in Indiana, the retention or expansion of
Indiana businesses, or the development of entrepreneurial
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


activities in Indiana; or
(viii) a governing body of a political subdivision;
with industrial, research, or commercial prospects, if the
records are created while negotiations are in progress.
However, this clause does not apply to records regarding
research that is prohibited under IC 16-34.5-1-2 or any other
law.
(B) Notwithstanding clause (A), the terms of the final offer of
public financial resources communicated by the Indiana
economic development corporation, the ports of Indiana, the
Indiana finance authority, an economic development
commission, the Indiana White River state park development
commission, or a governing body of a political subdivision to
an industrial, a research, or a commercial prospect shall be
available for inspection and copying under section 3 of this
chapter after negotiations with that prospect have terminated.
(C) When disclosing a final offer under clause (B), the Indiana
economic development corporation shall certify that the
information being disclosed accurately and completely
represents the terms of the final offer.
(D) Notwithstanding clause (A), an incentive agreement with
an incentive recipient shall be available for inspection and
copying under section 3 of this chapter after the date the
incentive recipient and the Indiana economic development
corporation execute the incentive agreement regardless of
whether negotiations are in progress with the recipient after
that date regarding a modification or extension of the incentive
agreement.
(6) Records that are intra-agency or interagency advisory or
deliberative material, including material developed by a private
contractor under a contract with a public agency, that are
expressions of opinion or are of a speculative nature, and that are
communicated for the purpose of decision making.
(7) Diaries, journals, or other personal notes serving as the
functional equivalent of a diary or journal.
(8) Personnel files of public employees and files of applicants for
public employment, except for:
(A) the name, compensation, job title, business address,
business telephone number, job description, education and
training background, previous work experience, or dates of
first and last employment of present or former officers or
employees of the agency;
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(B) information relating to the status of any formal charges
against the employee; and
(C) the factual basis for a disciplinary action in which final
action has been taken and that resulted in the employee being
suspended, demoted, or discharged.
However, all personnel file information shall be made available
to the affected employee or the employee's representative. This
subdivision does not apply to disclosure of personnel information
generally on all employees or for groups of employees without the
request being particularized by employee name.
(9) Minutes or records of hospital medical staff meetings.
(10) Administrative or technical information that would
jeopardize a record keeping system, voting system, voter
registration system, or security system.
(11) Computer programs, computer codes, computer filing
systems, and other software that are owned by the public agency
or entrusted to it and portions of electronic maps entrusted to a
public agency by a utility.
(12) Records specifically prepared for discussion or developed
during discussion in an executive session under IC 5-14-1.5-6.1.
However, this subdivision does not apply to that information
required to be available for inspection and copying under
subdivision (8).
(13) The work product of the legislative services agency under
personnel rules approved by the legislative council.
(14) The work product of individual members and the partisan
staffs of the general assembly.
(15) The identity of a donor of a gift made to a public agency if:
(A) the donor requires nondisclosure of the donor's identity as
a condition of making the gift; or
(B) after the gift is made, the donor or a member of the donor's
family requests nondisclosure.
(16) Library or archival records:
(A) which can be used to identify any library patron; or
(B) deposited with or acquired by a library upon a condition
that the records be disclosed only:
(i) to qualified researchers;
(ii) after the passing of a period of years that is specified in
the documents under which the deposit or acquisition is
made; or
(iii) after the death of persons specified at the time of the
acquisition or deposit.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


However, nothing in this subdivision shall limit or affect contracts
entered into by the Indiana state library pursuant to IC 4-1-6-8.
(17) The identity of any person who contacts the bureau of motor
vehicles concerning the ability of a driver to operate a motor
vehicle safely and the medical records and evaluations made by
the bureau of motor vehicles staff or members of the driver
licensing medical advisory board regarding the ability of a driver
to operate a motor vehicle safely. However, upon written request
to the commissioner of the bureau of motor vehicles, the driver
must be given copies of the driver's medical records and
evaluations.
(18) School safety and security measures, plans, and systems,
including emergency preparedness plans developed under 511
IAC 6.1-2-2.5.
(19) A record or a part of a record, the public disclosure of which
would have a reasonable likelihood of threatening public safety
by exposing a vulnerability to terrorist attack. A record described
under this subdivision includes the following:
(A) A record assembled, prepared, or maintained to prevent,
mitigate, or respond to an act of terrorism under IC 35-47-12-1
(before its repeal), an act of agricultural terrorism under
IC 35-47-12-2 (before its repeal), or a felony terrorist offense
(as defined in IC 35-50-2-18).
(B) Vulnerability assessments.
(C) Risk planning documents.
(D) Needs assessments.
(E) Threat assessments.
(F) Intelligence assessments.
(G) Domestic preparedness strategies.
(H) The location of community drinking water wells and
surface water intakes.
(I) The emergency contact information of emergency
responders and volunteers.
(J) Infrastructure records that disclose the configuration of
critical systems such as voting system and voter registration
system critical infrastructure, and communication, electrical,
ventilation, water, and wastewater systems.
(K) Detailed drawings or specifications of structural elements,
floor plans, and operating, utility, or security systems, whether
in paper or electronic form, of any building or facility located
on an airport (as defined in IC 8-21-1-1) that is owned,
occupied, leased, or maintained by a public agency, or any part
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


of a law enforcement recording that captures information
about airport security procedures, areas, or systems. A record
described in this clause may not be released for public
inspection by any public agency without the prior approval of
the public agency that owns, occupies, leases, or maintains the
airport. Both of the following apply to the public agency that
owns, occupies, leases, or maintains the airport:
(i) The public agency is responsible for determining whether
the public disclosure of a record or a part of a record,
including a law enforcement recording, has a reasonable
likelihood of threatening public safety by exposing a
security procedure, area, system, or vulnerability to terrorist
attack.
(ii) The public agency must identify a record described
under item (i) and clearly mark the record as "confidential
and not subject to public disclosure under
IC 5-14-3-4(b)(19)(J) without approval of (insert name of
submitting public agency)". However, in the case of a law
enforcement recording, the public agency must clearly mark
the record as "confidential and not subject to public
disclosure under IC 5-14-3-4(b)(19)(K) without approval of
(insert name of the public agency that owns, occupies,
leases, or maintains the airport)".
(L) The home address, home telephone number, and
emergency contact information for any:
(i) emergency management worker (as defined in
IC 10-14-3-3);
(ii) public safety officer (as defined in IC 35-47-4.5-3);
(iii) emergency medical responder (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-109.8); or
(iv) advanced emergency medical technician (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-6.5).
(M) Information relating to security measures or precautions
used to secure the statewide 911 system under IC 36-8-16.7.
This subdivision does not apply to a record or portion of a record
pertaining to a location or structure owned or protected by a
public agency in the event that an act of terrorism under
IC 35-47-12-1 (before its repeal), an act of agricultural terrorism
under IC 35-47-12-2 (before its repeal), or a felony terrorist
offense (as defined in IC 35-50-2-18) has occurred at that location
or structure, unless release of the record or portion of the record
would have a reasonable likelihood of threatening public safety
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


by exposing a vulnerability of other locations or structures to
terrorist attack.
(20) The following personal information concerning a customer
of a municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1):
(A) Telephone number.
(B) Address.
(C) Social Security number.
(21) The following personal information about a complainant
contained in records of a law enforcement agency:
(A) Telephone number.
(B) The complainant's address. However, if the complainant's
address is the location of the suspected crime, infraction,
accident, or complaint reported, the address shall be made
available for public inspection and copying.
(22) Notwithstanding subdivision (8)(A), the name,
compensation, job title, business address, business telephone
number, job description, education and training background,
previous work experience, or dates of first employment of a law
enforcement officer who is operating in an undercover capacity.
(23) Records requested by an offender, an agent, or a relative of
an offender that:
(A) contain personal information relating to:
(i) a correctional officer (as defined in IC 5-10-10-1.5);
(ii) a probation officer;
(iii) a community corrections officer;
(iv) a law enforcement officer (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-185);
(v) a judge (as defined in IC 33-38-12-3);
(vi) the victim of a crime; or
(vii) a family member of a correctional officer, probation
officer, community corrections officer, law enforcement
officer (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-185), judge (as defined
in IC 33-38-12-3), or victim of a crime; or
(B) concern or could affect the security of a jail or correctional
facility.
For purposes of this subdivision, "agent" means a person who is
authorized by an offender to act on behalf of, or at the direction
of, the offender, and "relative" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1(b). IC 35-42-2-1(a). However, the term "agent"
does not include an attorney in good standing admitted to the
practice of law in Indiana.
(24) Information concerning an individual less than eighteen (18)
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


years of age who participates in a conference, meeting, program,
or activity conducted or supervised by a state educational
institution, including the following information regarding the
individual or the individual's parent or guardian:
(A) Name.
(B) Address.
(C) Telephone number.
(D) Electronic mail account address.
(25) Criminal intelligence information.
(26) The following information contained in a report of unclaimed
property under IC 32-34-1.5-18 or in a claim for unclaimed
property under IC 32-34-1.5-48:
(A) Date of birth.
(B) Driver's license number.
(C) Taxpayer identification number.
(D) Employer identification number.
(E) Account number.
(27) Except as provided in subdivision (19) and sections 5.1 and
5.2 of this chapter, a law enforcement recording. However, before
disclosing the recording, the public agency must comply with the
obscuring requirements of sections 5.1 and 5.2 of this chapter, if
applicable.
(28) Records relating to negotiations between a state educational
institution and another entity concerning the establishment of a
collaborative relationship or venture to advance the research,
engagement, or educational mission of the state educational
institution, if the records are created while negotiations are in
progress. The terms of the final offer of public financial resources
communicated by the state educational institution to an industrial,
a research, or a commercial prospect shall be available for
inspection and copying under section 3 of this chapter after
negotiations with that prospect have terminated. However, this
subdivision does not apply to records regarding research
prohibited under IC 16-34.5-1-2 or any other law.
(c) Nothing contained in subsection (b) shall limit or affect the right
of a person to inspect and copy a public record required or directed to
be made by any statute or by any rule of a public agency.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a public record that is classified
as confidential, other than a record concerning:
(1) an adoption or patient medical records; or
(2) a birth or stillbirth;
shall be made available for inspection and copying seventy-five (75)
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


years after the creation of that record. A registration or certificate of a
birth or stillbirth shall be made available in accordance with
IC 16-37-1-7.5.
(e) Only the content of a public record may form the basis for the
adoption by any public agency of a rule or procedure creating an
exception from disclosure under this section.
(f) Except as provided by law, a public agency may not adopt a rule
or procedure that creates an exception from disclosure under this
section based upon whether a public record is stored or accessed using
paper, electronic media, magnetic media, optical media, or other
information storage technology.
(g) Except as provided by law, a public agency may not adopt a rule
or procedure nor impose any costs or liabilities that impede or restrict
the reproduction or dissemination of any public record.
(h) Notwithstanding subsection (d) and section 7 of this chapter:
(1) public records subject to IC 5-15 may be destroyed only in
accordance with record retention schedules under IC 5-15; or
(2) public records not subject to IC 5-15 may be destroyed in the
ordinary course of business.
SECTION 3. IC 22-1-1-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Health care employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(2) "School employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(3) "Workplace battery" means a battery described in
IC 35-42-2-1(d) or IC 35-42-2-1(g).
(b) The employer of a health care employee or school employee
shall make a workplace battery report as described in subsection
(c) to the commissioner if a health care employee or school
employee is the victim of workplace battery.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2027, the employer shall make the
workplace battery report required under subsection (b) each year
before:
(1) August 1, for the period from January 1 to June 30; and
(2) February 1, for the period from July 1 to December 31.
The report shall be made on a form provided by the commissioner.
(d) The workplace battery report must include the following
information:
(1) The name of the employer.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(2) The city and county in which a workplace battery was
committed.
(3) The time period covered by the report (January 1 to June
30 or July 1 to December 31).
(4) The number of workplace batteries that were committed
during the reporting period.
(5) The job title of each health care employee or school
employee who was the victim of the workplace battery.
(6) The date of each workplace battery.
(7) The address and specific location (such as "hospital
emergency room" or "school parking lot") where the
workplace battery occurred. However, if the battery occurred
at the health care employee's or school employee's home, the
report may not include the address.
(8) The circumstances surrounding the workplace battery and
any resulting injury, including the following, if known:
(A) The gender of the victim.
(B) The specific manner in which the workplace battery
was committed (such as by striking, biting, pushing,
kicking, use of an object, or use of a weapon).
(C) Whether the victim required hospitalization.
(D) If a weapon or other object was used to commit the
workplace battery, the type of weapon or object.
(E) Whether law enforcement was contacted or responded
to the workplace battery.
(F) Whether criminal charges were filed against the
perpetrator.
For a workplace battery that does not occur on the employer's
premises, the employer shall provide as much information as is
known to the employer.
(e) The employer shall make the report required under this
section regardless of whether a person is criminally charged with
the workplace battery.
SECTION 4. IC 27-10-2-4.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.147-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) The following definitions apply
throughout this section:
(1) "Charitable bail organization" means a business entity, or a
nonprofit organization under:
(A) the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) Indiana law;
that exists for the purpose of paying cash bail for another person.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


However, the term does not include a person who pays cash bail
for three (3) or fewer defendants in any one hundred eighty (180)
day period, or a person who pays bail for a relative (as defined in
IC 35-42-2-1(b)). IC 35-42-2-1(a)).
(2) "Crime of violence" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-50-1-2(a).
(b) The commissioner may certify a charitable bail organization if
the charitable bail organization:
(1) is a business entity, or a nonprofit organization under:
(A) the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) Indiana law;
(2) is currently registered to do business in Indiana;
(3) is located in Indiana; and
(4) exists for the purpose of depositing cash bail for an indigent
defendant who:
(A) is not charged with a crime of violence; or
(B) if charged with a felony, does not have a prior conviction
for a crime of violence.
(c) A person may apply for certification under this section in
accordance with rules adopted under this section.
(d) The commissioner shall certify a person as a charitable bail
organization if the:
(1) person pays an application fee of three hundred dollars
($300);
(2) person meets the requirements of this section; and
(3) person, including an officer or director of the person, has not
engaged in conduct that:
(A) constitutes fraud, dishonesty, or deception;
(B) constitutes malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
dealing with money; or
(C) resulted in the suspension or revocation of a previous
certification.
(e) A charitable bail certification is valid for two (2) years from the
date of issuance and may be renewed upon payment of a renewal fee
of three hundred dollars ($300). If a person applies for renewal before
the expiration of the existing certification, the existing certification
remains valid until the commissioner renews the certification, or until
five (5) days after the commissioner denies the application for renewal.
A person is entitled to renewal unless the commissioner denies the
application for renewal under subsection (f).
(f) The commissioner shall deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew certification for any of the following causes:
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(1) Any cause for which issuance of the certification could have
been refused had it then existed and been known to the
commissioner.
(2) Violation of any laws of this state in the course of dealings
under the certification.
(3) Material misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in
obtaining the certification.
(4) Misappropriation, conversion, or unlawful withholding of
money belonging to donors or others and received in the conduct
of business under the certification.
(5) Fraudulent or dishonest practices in the conduct of business
under the certification.
(6) Willful failure to comply with or willful violation of any
proper order or rule of the commissioner.
(7) When, in the judgment of the commissioner, the certificate
holder has, in the conduct of affairs under the certification,
demonstrated:
(A) incompetency or untrustworthiness;
(B) conduct or practices rendering the certificate holder unfit
to carry on charitable bail activities or making the certificate
holder's continuance detrimental to the public interest; or
(C) that the certificate holder is no longer in good faith
carrying on as a charitable bail organization;
and for these reasons is found by the commissioner to be a source
of detriment, injury, or loss to the public.
(8) The listing of the name of the applicant or certificate holder on
the most recent tax warrant list supplied to the commissioner by
the department of state revenue.
(g) A charitable bail organization must comply with all of the
following:
(1) If the charitable bail organization pays, or intends to pay, bail
for more than three (3) individuals in any one hundred eighty
(180) day period, the charitable bail organization must be certified
by the commissioner under this section before soliciting or
accepting donations for bail for another person, and before
depositing money for bail for another person.
(2) A charitable bail organization may not pay bail for a defendant
who:
(A) is charged with a crime of violence; or
(B) is charged with a felony and has a prior conviction for a
crime of violence.
(3) A charitable bail organization may not execute a surety bond
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


for a defendant.
(4) A charitable bail organization shall, before paying bail for an
individual, execute an agreement described in IC 35-33-8-3.2
allowing the court to retain all or a part of the bail to pay publicly
paid costs of representation and fines, costs, fees, and restitution
that the court may order the defendant to pay if the defendant is
convicted.
(5) A charitable bail organization may not charge a premium or
receive any consideration for acting as a charitable bail
organization.
(h) All fees collected under this section must be deposited in the
bail bond enforcement and administration fund created by
IC 27-10-5-1.
(i) Any authorized employee of a charitable bail organization may
only deposit cash bail to the court.
(j) If an individual fails to appear, the bail shall be forfeited in the
manner described in IC 35-33-8-7 and the court shall take the steps
described in IC 35-33-8-8.
SECTION 5. IC 35-31.5-2-151.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 151.8. "Health care employee",
for purposes of IC 35-42-2-1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
SECTION 6. IC 35-31.5-2-282.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 282.9. "School", for purposes of
IC 35-42-2-1, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-42-2-1.
SECTION 7. IC 35-31.5-2-284.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 284.4. "School employee", for
purposes of IC 35-42-2-1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
SECTION 8. IC 35-40.5-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2021,
SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
article:
(1) "Law enforcement officer" means any of the following:
(A) A law enforcement officer (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-185).
(B) A state educational institution police officer appointed
under IC 21-39-4.
(C) A school corporation police officer appointed under
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


IC 20-26-16.
(D) A school resource officer (as defined in IC 20-26-18.2-1).
(E) A police officer of a private postsecondary educational
institution whose governing board has appointed the police
officer under IC 21-17-5-2.
(2) "Provider" has the meaning set forth in IC 16-21-8-0.2.
(3) "Relative" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-42-2-1(b).
IC 35-42-2-1(a).
(4) "Sexual assault forensic evidence" means the results collected
from a forensic medical examination of a victim by a provider.
(5) "State sexual assault response team" means the statewide
sexual assault response team coordinated by the Indiana
prosecuting attorneys council and the Indiana criminal justice
institute.
(6) "Victim" means an individual:
(A) who is a victim of sexual assault (as defined in
IC 5-26.5-1-8); or
(B) who:
(i) is a relative of or a person who has had a close personal
relationship with the individual described under clause (A);
and
(ii) is designated by the individual described under clause
(A) as a representative.
The term does not include an individual who is accused of
committing an act of sexual assault (as defined in IC 5-26.5-1-8)
against the individual described under clause (A).
(7) "Victim advocate" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-37-6-3.5.
(8) "Victim service provider" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-37-6-5.
SECTION 9. IC 35-42-2-0.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.65-2016,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. "Relative", for purposes of IC 35-42-2-1,
section 1 of this chapter, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-42-2-1(b).
section 1(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 35-42-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "public safety
official" means:
(1) a law enforcement officer, including an alcoholic beverage
enforcement officer;
(2) an employee of a penal facility or a juvenile detention facility
(as defined in IC 31-9-2-71);
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(3) an employee of the department of correction;
(4) a probation officer;
(5) a parole officer;
(6) a community corrections worker;
(7) a home detention officer;
(8) a department of child services employee;
(9) a firefighter;
(10) an emergency medical services provider;
(11) a judicial officer;
(12) a bailiff of any court; or
(13) a special deputy (as described in IC 36-8-10-10.6).
(b) As used in this section, "relative" means an individual related by
blood, half-blood, adoption, marriage, or remarriage, including:
(1) a spouse;
(2) a parent or stepparent;
(3) a child or stepchild;
(4) a grandchild or stepgrandchild;
(5) a grandparent or stepgrandparent;
(6) a brother, sister, stepbrother, or stepsister;
(7) a niece or nephew;
(8) an aunt or uncle;
(9) a daughter-in-law or son-in-law;
(10) a mother-in-law or father-in-law; or
(11) a first cousin.
(a) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Health care employee" means an individual whose
responsibilities involve contact or interaction with a patient,
and who is employed by, in a contractual relationship with, or
providing services on behalf of:
(A) an individual;
(B) a partnership;
(C) a professional corporation;
(D) a facility;
(E) an institution;
(F) a hospital; or
(G) any entity;
that is licensed, certified, or authorized to administer health
care in the ordinary course of business or practice of the
profession.
(2) "Public safety official" means:
(A) a law enforcement officer, including an alcoholic
beverage enforcement officer;
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(B) an employee of a penal facility or a juvenile detention
facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-71);
(C) an employee of the department of correction;
(D) a probation officer;
(E) a parole officer;
(F) a community corrections worker;
(G) a home detention officer;
(H) a department of child services employee whose
responsibilities include:
(i) personally supervising a child or parent;
(ii) personally providing services to a child or parent; or
(iii) personally interviewing a child or parent as part of
an investigation;
(I) a firefighter;
(J) an emergency medical services provider;
(K) a judicial officer;
(L) a bailiff of any court; or
(M) a special deputy (as described in IC 36-8-10-10.6).
(3) "Relative" means an individual related by blood,
half-blood, adoption, marriage, or remarriage, including:
(A) a spouse;
(B) a parent or stepparent;
(C) a child or stepchild;
(D) a grandchild or stepgrandchild;
(E) a grandparent or stepgrandparent;
(F) a brother, sister, stepbrother, or stepsister;
(G) a niece or nephew;
(H) an aunt or uncle;
(I) a daughter-in-law or son-in-law;
(J) a mother-in-law or father-in-law; or
(K) a first cousin.
(4) "School" means a public school, charter school, or
nonpublic school with at least one (1) employee.
(5) "School employee" means a person who:
(A) is employed by a school or is in a contractual
relationship with a school; and
(B) has direct and ongoing contact with a student.
(c) (b) Except as provided in subsections (d) (c) through (k), (l), a
person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) touches another person in a rude, insolent, or angry manner;
or
(2) in a rude, insolent, or angry manner places any bodily fluid or
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


waste on another person;
commits battery, a Class B misdemeanor.
(d) (c) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2)
(b)(2) is a Class A misdemeanor if it:
(1) results in bodily injury to any other person; or
(2) is committed against a member of a foster family home (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-139.3) by a person who is not a resident
of the foster family home if the person who committed the offense
is a relative of a person who lived in the foster family home at the
time of the offense.
(d) The offense described in subsection (b)(1) is a Class A
misdemeanor if it is committed against a health care employee or
school employee:
(1) while the health care employee or school employee is
acting within the scope of the health care employee's or school
employee's employment;
(2) while the health care employee or school employee is
commuting to or from the health care employee's or school
employee's place of employment; or
(3) in retaliation for an act taken by the health care employee
or school employee within the scope of the health care
employee's or school employee's employment;
unless the offense is committed by a person detained or committed
under IC 12-26.
(e) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2) (b)(2)
is a Level 6 felony if one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The offense results in moderate bodily injury to any other
person.
(2) The offense is committed against a public safety official while
the official is engaged in the official's official duty, unless the
offense is committed by a person detained or committed under
IC 12-26.
(3) The offense is committed against a person less than fourteen
(14) years of age and is committed by a person at least eighteen
(18) years of age.
(4) The offense is committed against a person of any age who has
a mental or physical disability and is committed by a person
having the care of the person with the mental or physical
disability, whether the care is assumed voluntarily or because of
a legal obligation.
(5) The offense is committed against an endangered adult (as
defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(6) The offense:
(A) is committed against a member of a foster family home (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-139.3) by a person who is not a
resident of the foster family home if the person who committed
the offense is a relative of a person who lived in the foster
family home at the time of the offense; and
(B) results in bodily injury to the member of the foster family.
(f) The offense described in subsection (c)(2) (b)(2) is a Level 6
felony if the person knew or recklessly failed to know that the bodily
fluid or waste placed on another person was infected with hepatitis,
tuberculosis, or human immunodeficiency virus.
(g) The offense described in subsection (b)(1) is a Level 6 felony
if it results in bodily injury to a health care employee or school
employee and is committed against the health care employee or
school employee:
(1) while the health care employee or school employee is
acting within the scope of the health care employee's or school
employee's employment;
(2) while the health care employee or school employee is
commuting to or from the health care employee's or school
employee's place of employment; or
(3) in retaliation for an act taken by the health care employee
or school employee within the scope of the health care
employee's or school employee's employment;
unless the offense is committed by a person detained or committed
under IC 12-26.
(g) (h) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2)
(b)(2) is a Level 5 felony if one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The offense results in serious bodily injury to another person.
(2) The offense is committed with a deadly weapon.
(3) The offense results in bodily injury to a pregnant woman if the
person knew of the pregnancy.
(4) The person has a previous conviction for a battery or
strangulation offense included in this chapter against the same
victim.
(5) The offense results in bodily injury to one (1) or more of the
following:
(A) A public safety official while the official is engaged in the
official's official duties, unless the offense is committed by a
person detained or committed under IC 12-26.
(B) A person less than fourteen (14) years of age if the offense
is committed by a person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(C) A person who has a mental or physical disability if the
offense is committed by an individual having care of the
person with the disability, regardless of whether the care is
assumed voluntarily or because of a legal obligation.
(D) An endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
(h) (i) The offense described in subsection (c)(2) (b)(2) is a Level
5 felony if:
(1) the person knew or recklessly failed to know that the bodily
fluid or waste placed on another person was infected with
hepatitis, tuberculosis, or human immunodeficiency virus; and
(2) the person placed the bodily fluid or waste on a public safety
official, unless the offense is committed by a person detained or
committed under IC 12-26.
(i) (j) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2)
(b)(2) is a Level 4 felony if it results in serious bodily injury to an
endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
(j) (k) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2)
(b)(2) is a Level 3 felony if it results in serious bodily injury to a person
less than fourteen (14) years of age if the offense is committed by a
person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(k) (l) The offense described in subsection (c)(1) (b)(1) or (c)(2)
(b)(2) is a Level 2 felony if it results in the death of one (1) or more of
the following:
(1) A person less than fourteen (14) years of age if the offense is
committed by a person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) An endangered adult (as defined in IC 12-10-3-2).
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1040, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 11, between lines 19 and 20, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 22-8-1.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, unless otherwise
provided:
"Board" means the board of safety review created by this chapter.
"Commission" means the occupational safety standards commission
created by this chapter.
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor or the
commissioner's duly designated representative.
"Department" means the department of labor.
"Employee" means a person permitted to work by an employer in
employment.
"Employer" means any individual or type of organization, including
the state and all its political subdivisions, that has in its employ one (1)
or more individuals.
"INSafe" means the division of the department created by section 40
of this chapter.
"Safety order" refers to a notice issued to employers by the
commissioner of labor for alleged violations of this chapter, including
any health and safety standards.
"Standard" refers to both health and safety standards.
"Voluntary protection program" means a program offered by the
United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration to
employers subject to this chapter that exempts the employers from
general scheduled inspections.
"Vulnerable worker" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-42-2-1.
SECTION 2. IC 22-8-1.1-43.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 43.2. (a) The employer of a
vulnerable worker shall make a report to the commissioner if the
vulnerable worker is the victim of workplace battery as described
in IC 35-42-2-1(d) or IC 35-42-2-1(g).
(b) The employer shall make the report not later than:
(1) eight (8) hours after the incident occurs, if the incident
results in the death or hospitalization of the victim; or
(2) twenty-four (24) hours after the incident occurs, if the
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


incident does not result in the death or hospitalization of the
victim.
The employer shall make the report required under this subsection
regardless of whether a person is criminally charged with the
workplace battery.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1040 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 1.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Corrections and Criminal
Law, to which was referred House Bill No. 1040, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 11, between lines 34 and 35, begin a new paragraph and insert:
""Health care employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.".
Page 11, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new paragraph and insert:
""School employee" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-42-2-1.".
Page 12, delete lines 3 through 18, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 4. IC 22-8-1.1-43.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 43.2. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Health care employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(2) "School employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(3) "Workplace battery" means a battery described in
IC 35-42-2-1(d) or IC 35-42-2-1(g).
(b) The employer of a health care employee or school employee
shall make a workplace battery report as described in subsection
(c) to the commissioner if a health care employee or school
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


employee is the victim of workplace battery.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2027, the employer shall make the
workplace battery report required under subsection (b) each year
before:
(1) August 1, for the period from January 1 to June 30; and
(2) February 1, for the period from July 1 to December 31.
The report shall be made on a form provided by the commissioner.
(d) The workplace battery report must include the following
information:
(1) The name of the employer.
(2) The city and county in which a workplace battery was
committed.
(3) The time period covered by the report (January 1 to June
or July 1 to December 31).
(4) The number of workplace batteries that were committed
during the reporting period.
(5) The job title of each health care employee or school
employee who was the victim of the workplace battery.
(6) The date of each workplace battery.
(7) The address and specific location (such as "hospital
emergency room" or "school parking lot") where the
workplace battery occurred. However, if the battery occurred
at the health care employee's or school employee's home, the
report may not include the address.
(8) The circumstances surrounding the workplace battery and
any resulting injury, including the following, if known:
(A) The gender of the victim.
(B) The specific manner in which the workplace battery
was committed (such as by striking, biting, pushing,
kicking, use of an object, or use of a weapon).
(C) Whether the victim required hospitalization.
(D) If a weapon or other object was used to commit the
workplace battery, the type of weapon or object.
(E) Whether law enforcement was contacted or responded
to the workplace battery.
(F) Whether criminal charges were filed against the
perpetrator.
For a workplace battery that does not occur on the employer's
premises, the employer shall provide as much information as is
known to the employer.
(e) The employer shall make the report required under this
section regardless of whether a person is criminally charged with
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


the workplace battery.".
Page 15, delete lines 18 through 22.
Page 18, delete lines 28 through 30.
Page 19, delete lines 4 through 13, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(d) The offense described in subsection (b)(1) is a Class A
misdemeanor if it is committed against a health care employee or
school employee:
(1) while the health care employee or school employee is
acting within the scope of the health care employee's or school
employee's employment;
(2) while the health care employee or school employee is
commuting to or from the health care employee's or school
employee's place of employment; or
(3) in retaliation for an act taken by the health care employee
or school employee within the scope of the health care
employee's or school employee's employment;
unless the offense is committed by a person detained or committed
under IC 12-26.".
Page 20, delete lines 1 through 11, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(g) The offense described in subsection (b)(1) is a Level 6 felony
if it results in bodily injury to a health care employee or school
employee and is committed against the health care employee or
school employee:
(1) while the health care employee or school employee is
acting within the scope of the health care employee's or school
employee's employment;
(2) while the health care employee or school employee is
commuting to or from the health care employee's or school
employee's place of employment; or
(3) in retaliation for an act taken by the health care employee
or school employee within the scope of the health care
employee's or school employee's employment;
unless the offense is committed by a person detained or committed
under IC 12-26.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1040 as printed January 8, 2026.)
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


FREEMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 0.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Engrossed House Bill 1040 be amended
to read as follows:
Page 11, delete lines 20 through 42, begin a new paragraph, and
insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 22-1-1-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Health care employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(2) "School employee" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(3) "Workplace battery" means a battery described in
IC 35-42-2-1(d) or IC 35-42-2-1(g).
(b) The employer of a health care employee or school employee
shall make a workplace battery report as described in subsection
(c) to the commissioner if a health care employee or school
employee is the victim of workplace battery.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2027, the employer shall make the
workplace battery report required under subsection (b) each year
before:
(1) August 1, for the period from January 1 to June 30; and
(2) February 1, for the period from July 1 to December 31.
The report shall be made on a form provided by the commissioner.
(d) The workplace battery report must include the following
information:
(1) The name of the employer.
(2) The city and county in which a workplace battery was
committed.
(3) The time period covered by the report (January 1 to June
or July 1 to December 31).
(4) The number of workplace batteries that were committed
during the reporting period.
(5) The job title of each health care employee or school
employee who was the victim of the workplace battery.
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106


(6) The date of each workplace battery.
(7) The address and specific location (such as "hospital
emergency room" or "school parking lot") where the
workplace battery occurred. However, if the battery occurred
at the health care employee's or school employee's home, the
report may not include the address.
(8) The circumstances surrounding the workplace battery and
any resulting injury, including the following, if known:
(A) The gender of the victim.
(B) The specific manner in which the workplace battery
was committed (such as by striking, biting, pushing,
kicking, use of an object, or use of a weapon).
(C) Whether the victim required hospitalization.
(D) If a weapon or other object was used to commit the
workplace battery, the type of weapon or object.
(E) Whether law enforcement was contacted or responded
to the workplace battery.
(F) Whether criminal charges were filed against the
perpetrator.
For a workplace battery that does not occur on the employer's
premises, the employer shall provide as much information as is
known to the employer.
(e) The employer shall make the report required under this
section regardless of whether a person is criminally charged with
the workplace battery.".
Delete page 12.
Page 13, delete lines 1 through 19.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to EHB 1040 as printed February 13, 2026.)
FREEMAN
EH 1040—LS 6292/DI 106